languagetool-language-modules/pap/src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/pap/hunspell/pap_CW.aff
SET UTF-8

TRY aieonstrkldmuphbgáfvèòcóíyéwñzjùúüABCSKIHEPLGTFxMJRqYXVDç

# For the default apostrophe and typographical apostrophe support in command-line
WORDCHARS '’

REP 2
REP sion$ shon
REP oe u

MAP 8
MAP uüùú
MAP iìí
MAP eèé
MAP aàá
MAP oòó
MAP nñ
MAP bv
MAP kc

SFX D Y 2
SFX D   u     'i    u
SFX D   a     'i    a

SFX O Y 2
SFX O   a     'é    a
SFX O   0     é     i

SFX M Y 3     
SFX M   0     mentu     [^áé]
SFX M   á     amentu    á
SFX M   é     ementu    é

SFX R Y 1
SFX R   á     ador      á

SFX Q Y 1
SFX Q   á     adó       á

SFX N Y 1
SFX N   á     ando      á

SFX H Y 1
SFX H   á     ashon     á

SFX P Y 1
SFX P   0     nan
