languagetool-language-modules/pap/src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/pap/hunspell/pap_CW.dic
abusá/QRNM
adorá/QH
aerolínea/P
afektá/NH
afiliá/NH
afrikanisá/H
agitá/QNH
aglomerá/H
agonisá/N
agotá/MR
agrikultor/P
agrupá/NH
agudisá/N
aira/M
aklará/HN
aklimatisá/HN
akomodá/HN
akoplá/MN
aktivá/N
aktivo/P
akumulá/NH
akusá/MQNH
alehá/N
alehandrino/P
alfabetisá/MHN
aligerá/N
alimentá/HN
aliterá/H
alkansá/N
almasená/M
alterá/NH
altesa/P
amonestá/HN
amor/P
ampliá/HN
analisá/NH
ancha/M
anfibio/P
anikilá/H
animá/QNH
anotá/NHQ
antiano/P
antisipá/NH
antohá/N
apartá/NM
apdiká/H
apelante/P
apliká/HN
apoderá/H
aprobá/HN
apropiá/H
apuntá/MN
aquarium/P
arestá/N
arkeólogo/P
arma/PM
artikulá/H
asegurado/P
aselerá/HN
asentuá/H
asesorá/NM
asfaltá/N
asigná/H
asosiá/HN
asotá/N
aspirina/P
ataká/NQ
ata/O
atministrá/QRHN
atmirá/NRQH
atmosfer/P
atraká/RQN
averiguá/NH
avion/P
awa/OP
babá/NQ
baha/M
bailá/NQ
bailarin/P
bai/M
baka/OP
baliá/QN
balki/P
balorá/NH
balotá/NHM
baluá/QNH
bandoná/MN
barakoa/P
báritòn/P
barnisá/M
basá/N
basilá/NMH
batisá/MN
batuta/P
beatifiká/H
bek/M
bende/M
benefaktor/P
bengá/Q
bestèk/P
bieu/P
bindishoná/NM
bisa/O
bisèps/P
bisti/M
blanchá/NQ
bleki/P
blòkia/M
boga/M
bog/P
bolsa/P
bòm/MP
borá/N
bòrdá/NQ
bor/PM
bos/P
boteyá/QMN
botoná/MN
brasa/PM
brasilero/P
bringa/M
bringá/QN
bruá/HNQ
brùg/P
bruha/M
bula/M
bulá/NQ
búlgaro/P
buská/NQ
buta/M
butik/P
buyá/N
chekeo/P
chibatiá/M
chiflá/Q
chika/MO
chi/P
choká/Q
chupa/M
chupá/QPN
dader/P
debilitá/N
deboshon/P
deformá/HN
degenerá/H
deklamadó/P
deklamá/HQN
dekliná/HN
dekorá/HMQN
dekretá/N
delegá/H
delimitá/H
demonisá/H
demostrá/QHN
denominá/HNQ
denominashon/P
depilá/NH
deportá/NH
depresiá/H
deregulá/HR
derivá/NH
derotá/N
desaprobá/HN
desaroyadó/P
desaroyá/QN
deseá/MN
desempeñá/N
desentralisá/HN
desgará/R
deshumanisá/HN
desifrá/N
desintoksiká/H
deskonekshon/P
deskontá/N
desmobilisá/H
desokupá/H
desorganisá/H
despachá/QN
despolarisá/H
destilá/HN
destiná/H
determiná/NH
dialekto/P
dialisá/Q
dibulgá/H
difamá/QH
diferensiá/H
diktá/RN
diler/P
diptongá/H
diseñá/QN
disfrutá/N
disiplina/P
diskriminá/H
distansiá/H
dividivi/P
divulgá/H
djadja/M
djòp/P
dòbel/PM
doblá/PN
domestiká/NH
dominikana/P
dòrná/NQ
draga/P
dramatisá/HN
drecha/M
drechá/NQ
drùk/M
duda/P
duná/QN
edifiká/HN
edukadó/P
eduká/QRHNM
ehakulá/H
ekibuká/H
eksagerá/HN
eksaminadó/P
eksaminá/QN
ekshalá/HN
ekskavá/H
eksperensiá/N
ekspirá/NH
eksplotá/QNH
eksportá/RQNH
eksposishon/P
ekspropiá/HN
elaborá/NH
elevá/HN
èlpe/P
emaná/N
emansipá/HQN
emboteyá/Q
empeorá/MH
enano/P
enfatisá/N
enkantá/R
enkarná/H
entoná/HN
entregá/N
entrenadó/P
entrená/QNM
entrevistá/Q
envidiá/N
eroshon/P
es/P
estudiante/P
europeisá/H
evaluá/NQH
evolushon/P
fabriká/NH
faha/MP
falsifiká/QNH
falta/DPM
famá/Q
fam/P
fantasiá/N
faya/M
feitá/N
fekundá/H
feneta/P
fèrfelá/MN
fertilisá/HN
fiá/NQ
figurá/NH
fikshon/P
filma/M
filmá/NH
finansiá/NHQM
firmadó/P
firma/MP
firmá/NQ
flèt/P
floresé/M
fonema/P
formá/NHQR
forniká/NHQ
fortalesa/OP
fortifiká/NH
fotografia/P
frakasá/N
frakshoná/NM
fregá/NQ
frekuentá/N
frena/MP
frustrá/HN
fugitivo/P
fumigá/HN
fundá/HQ
fungi/M
furá/NQ
gaba/M
gabá/N
galaksia/P
ganá/NQ
gará/N
garnachi/P
gatia/M
generá/HN
generalisá/NH
geógrafo/P
glòf/P
glotalisá/H
goberná/NHR
goliá/Q
gòlpiá/N
grabá/HNQ
grabashon/P
grap/PM
gratifiká/H
grel/P
grita/M
gritá/PN
guiá/NQ
guia/PM
guli/M
gumá/N
habraká/NM
haitiano/P
halagá/Q
halá/NQP
haña/M
harka/PM
hasí/P
hawá/N
hèndikèp/P
hera/M
hiato/P
hibá/QN
hincha/M
hinchá/NQ
hipnotisá/Q
hisá/QN
hispanisá/NH
hòbi/P
hode/M
hogá/N
horoskop/P
hòrta/M
hòrtá/NQ
huki/P
humá/NQ
humiliá/H
hundi/M
hungá/QN
hür/MP
husgá/N
ideologia/P
iluminá/HN
ilustrá/HQN
imitá/QNH
implantá/HN
implantashon/P
implorá/HN
importá/QHN
improvisá/HN
indeksá/HN
indiká/HNQ
indikativo/P
individualisá/H
infektá/N
inflamá/NH
informá/QHN
informashon/P
inisiá/NQ
inkorporá/HN
inmensidat/P
inmunisá/H
inová/HQ
inseminá/HN
insinuá/HN
instabilidat/P
instalá/HN
instigá/Q
insultá/QMN
integrá/HN
intentá/N
interior/P
intermediá/QNH
internashonalisá/H
interogá/NH
interpretá/NH
introdukshon/P
investigá/NHQ
invitá/NH
islaribeño/P
kaba/M
kabá/N
kabisá/P
kahera/P
kai/M
kalentá/NM
kalifiká/NH
kalifikativo/P
kalkulá/QMNH
kalma/M
kambiá/N
kampaña/P
kaña/MP
kaná/NQP
kana/POM
kanguru/P
kantá/NQ
kapitulá/HN
kapótias/P
kap/PM
kaptá/N
kardus/P
kargá/NQ
kariñá/MN
karisia/MP
karpeu/P
kasa/MO
kasá/NQPH
kaska/PM
kastá/N
kastigá/MN
kategorisá/HN
katuna/P
keintá/N
kende/P
kere/M
kibrá/QN
kiloampèr/P
kimá/N
kis/PM
kitara/P
klarifiká/H
klasifiká/QHN
klèm/MP
klèp/P
klousurá/N
kobá/QN
kobarde/P
kobrá/NQ
kodifiká/HN
kofinansiá/QM
kokomakaku/P
kolaborá/HNQ
kolá/NQ
kolekshoná/NMQ
kolektá/N
kologá/MN
koloká/H
kolonisá/HNQ
komandante/P
koma/O
kòmbersá/NQH
komersialisá/H
kometa/PO
komisario/P
kompañá/MN
kompilá/HQ
komplementá/HN
kompliká/NHM
komputarisá/H
kondekorá/HN
kondena/MP
konekshon/P
konektá/N
konfiská/HN
konglomerá/H
kònkel/MP
konkistá/QN
konmemorá/HN
konsehá/NM
konservá/HNQ
konservashon/P
konsientisá/HN
konsipiá/NM
konsolidá/H
konspirá/HQ
kontaktá/NM
konta/M
kontaminá/NQH
kontá/NQ
kontemplá/NH
kontestá/NH
kontroladó/P
kontrolá/Q
konvensé/M
konvoká/H
kooperá/RQNH
koordiná/NQH
kopiá/NQ
korelá/H
koroná/HN
kòrta/M
kòrtá/NPQ
kosa/O
kosecha/MP
kousa/MP
kreá/HNQ
kria/M
kriá/NQP
krioyisá/HN
krusá/N
kuantifiká/H
kubri/M
kuèrdè/P
kuidá/NQ
kulminá/NH
kultivá/QNH
kuminda/MP
kumprá/QN
kuna/PO
kura/M
labadó/P
laba/M
labá/NQP
landá/QN
lanta/M
lantá/NQ
lasá/QN
las/MP
legalisá/HN
legislá/QH
legitimá/HN
lele/M
lesá/NQ
libreria/P
lidia/PM
ligá/N
likidá/QNH
limpiá/QPN
lincha/M
lochá/N
lombrishi/P
lorá/N
lora/PM
lubidá/MNQ
lur/M
makamba/P
makiá/NMQ
malinterpretá/H
mancha/MP
manchá/N
manehá/NQ
mangasina/P
manipulá/QHN
marga/M
marginalisá/H
marmer/P
maska/M
matrikulá/NH
médiùm/P
mehorá/NH
mèp/PM
mesklá/N
meteor/P
mira/MO
mirá/QN
mishon/P
modelá/QN
moderá/NQH
modifiká/HNQ
montoná/N
monumento/P
morde/M
mortifiká/H
muha/MO
multipliká/NQH
musikólogo/P
mustra/M
mutilá/H
namorá/NM
naturalisá/HN
negosiá/HQN
nenga/M
nesesidat/P
nihilá/HN
nivelá/MNHQ
nombra/M
nombrá/N
notá/NHQ
numerá/NMQH
oásis/P
odia/M
okupá/HN
operá/NHQ
opinion/P
opservá/HQN
optimalisá/H
organisá/QNH
orina/M
ougùrk/P
ousiliá/N
outentiká/H
pagá/NQ
pagara/OP
pakus/P
palatalisá/HN
palu/DP
papia/M
papiá/QN
paralelismo/P
pasha/P
pasifiká/NHQ
pas/MP
pata/OP
patrosiná/MQ
pegá/N
pèki/P
pelá/QNP
peña/MP
pensá/NQ
perhudiká/N
per/M
pèrmit/P
perturbá/QRH
pidi/MO
pil/M
pímpiri/P
pisa/M
piská/QNP
plagia/M
plania/M
planifiká/H
plantashon/P
plata/O
pleita/M
polarisá/HN
pòm/P
pompa/M
pompá/Q
posponé/M
pòwis/P
prediká/QN
preokupá/HN
presentá/QHN
prestá/HN
preteksto/P
primi/M
probechá/NMQ
profundisá/NH
programá/NQH
pronominalisá/H
propaganda/P
prosesá/NMQ
protestá/QN
provoká/QHN
pruf/PM
publiká/NH
pulmon/P
pupu/PM
purifiká/NQH
pushá/N
pusta/M
raka/M
rashonalista/P
raska/M
realisá/NH
reda/PM
redá/Q
redupliká/NH
refreská/MN
refutá/NH
regenbog/P
regla/PM
regulá/QNH
reklamá/HN
rekohé/M
rekomendá/NH
rekonsiliá/QH
rekuperá/HN
relahá/NH
remplasante/P
renombrá/M
reorganisá/H
representá/NH
resá/NQ
reseñá/NQ
reservá/HN
respaldá/N
respirá/NH
respu/PM
restu/P
revalidá/HN
revoká/H
ripará/N
roba/M
ròk/P
rosa/PM
sabotiá/Q
saká/QN
sakiá/Q
saksofon/P
salbá/NQH
salga/M
salgá/N
saminá/HQN
sana/M
santifiká/NH
seder/P
sefta/MP
selebrá/HN
selekshoná/N
sembrá/NQ
sende/M
sensura/P
separá/NH
seya/M
shirt/P
shuata/M
simbolisá/NH
simplesa/P
siña/M
sinkopá/N
sirkulá/NH
sisti/M
sivilisá/NH
skamá/N
skèch/P
skèts/PM
skonde/M
skual/MP
slep/M
sneiru/P
snup/M
sombra/OP
soñá/QN
sosegá/N
sostenedó/P
soya/M
spekulá/HNQ
spesifiká/NH
splika/M
sprei/P
spula/M
standarisá/HN
stashoná/MN
stimá/HQ
stima/M
stipulá/NH
stòpkontakt/P
stot/MP
stret/M
striká/PNQ
studia/M
suich/PM
supdirektor/P
superá/N
suplementá/H
surti/M
sutá/N
taitai/P
tait/M
taksá/NQ
tefi/P
teip/PM
tende/M
teritorio/P
tèst/MP
titilá/NM
tokai/P
toká/NPQ
tòrnu/M
torturá/H
traha/M
traishon/P
tranka/MOP
transbordá/R
transformá/HN
transpirá/NH
transportá/HNQ
trapa/M
trep/P
trit/PM
trompeká/PNM
tuma/M
tuna/P
uniformá/HN
uni/M
usá/NQ
variá/NH
vegetariano/P
vengá/NQ
verdof/M
verifiká/HN
visa/P
vokalisá/HN
warawara/P
waya/MP
wòsher/P
yama/M
yobe/M
yorá/NPQ
zag/MP
zetero/P
zoyá/NP
zuip/MP
